Hawaii statutes.
[§425-1.6] Filing requirements;
filing duty of the director. (a) A document must satisfy the requirements
of this section, and of any other section that adds to or varies from these
requirements, to be entitled to filing by the director.

(b) The document must contain the information
required by this chapter. It may contain other information as well.

(c) If the director has prescribed a mandatory
form for the document, the document must be in or on the prescribed form.

(d) The director's duty to file documents
under this chapter is ministerial. The filing or refusal to file a document
does not:

(1) Affect the validity of the document in whole or
part;

(2) Relate to the correctness or incorrectness of
information contained in the document; or

(3) Create a presumption that the document is valid
or invalid or that information contained in the document is correct or
incorrect. [L 1995, c 198, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next